Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 2. Cancellation, Suspension, Revocation, or Limitation of Drivers’ Licenses.

Sec. 28.15.161.
Cancellation of driver’s license.

The department shall cancel a driver’s license upon determination that

the licensee is not medically or otherwise entitled to the issuance or retention of the license, or has been adjudged incompetent to drive a motor vehicle;

there is an error or defect in the license;

the licensee failed to give the required or correct information in the licensee’s application;

the license was obtained fraudulently;

the licensee is restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages under AS

04.16.160

; if a license is cancelled under this paragraph, when a new license is issued, it must reflect that restriction and the requirements of AS

28.15.111

if the period of restriction under AS

04.16.160

is still in effect;

the licensee has a license issued under AS

28.15.046

and has been convicted of an offense described in AS

28.15.046(c)

or (d) that would disqualify the licensee from obtaining a license under that section; or

the licensee owes $1,000 or more in unpaid fines for offenses involving a moving motor vehicle and failed to

pay the fines in full as required by the court; or

make payments in good faith on the unpaid balance of the fines under a payment plan established by the department.

The licensee may apply for a new license at any time after cancellation upon removal of the cause for the cancellation.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 28 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 9 ch 45 SLA 2014; am § 91 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For school bus driver permit, see 2 AAC 90, art. 2.

For classified driver's licenses, see 2 AAC 90, art. 4.

For standards for licensing of drivers, see 2 AAC 90, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, added (a)(6), and made a related change.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, added (a)(7), and made related stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(k), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment to (a) of this section applies “to a driver's license canceled on or after July 9, 2019 for failure to pay fines imposed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 28.15.165.
Administrative revocations and disqualifications resulting from chemical sobriety tests and refusals to submit to tests.

A law enforcement officer shall read a notice, and deliver a copy of it, to a person operating a motor vehicle, commercial motor vehicle, or aircraft, if a chemical test administered under AS

28.33.031(a)

or AS

28.35.031(a)

or (g) produces a result described in AS

28.35.030(a)(2)

; a chemical test administered under AS

28.33.031(a)

produces a result described in AS

28.33.030(a)(2)

; or the person refuses to submit to a chemical test authorized under AS 28.33.031(a) or AS

28.35.031(a)

or (g). The notice must advise that

the department intends to revoke the person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license, refuse to issue an original license to the person, or disqualify the person;

the person has the right to administrative review of the action taken against the person’s license or determination not to issue an original license;

if the person has a driver’s license or a nonresident privilege to drive, the notice itself is a temporary driver’s license that expires seven days after it is delivered to the person, except that if the person was operating a commercial motor vehicle the person will be ordered out of service for 24 hours under AS

28.33.130

;

revocation of the person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license, a determination not to issue an original license, or a disqualification of the person, takes effect seven days after delivery of the notice to the person unless the person, within seven days, requests an administrative review.

After reading the notice under (a) of this section, the law enforcement officer shall seize the person’s driver’s license if it is in the person’s possession and shall deliver it to the department with a sworn report describing the circumstances under which it was seized. If the person was operating a commercial motor vehicle, the officer shall order the person out of service under AS

28.33.130

.

Unless the person has obtained a temporary permit or stay of a departmental action under AS

28.15.166

, if the chemical test administered under AS

28.33.031(a)

or AS

28.35.031(a)

or (g) produced a result described in AS

28.35.030(a)(2)

or the person refused to submit to a chemical test authorized under AS

28.33.031(a)

or AS

28.35.031(a)

or (g), the department shall revoke the person’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license, shall refuse to issue an original license, and, if the chemical test administered under AS 28.33.031(a) produced a result described in AS

28.33.030

(a)(2) or the person refused to submit to a chemical test authorized under AS 28.33.031(a), shall disqualify the person. The department’s action takes effect seven days after delivery to the person of the notice required under (a) of this section, and after receipt of a sworn report of a law enforcement officer

that a chemical test administered under AS 28.33.031(a) or AS 28.35.031(a) or (g) produced a result described in AS

28.35.030(a)(2)

, that a chemical test administered under AS 28.33.031(a) produced a result described in AS

28.33.030

(a)(2), or that a person refused to submit to a chemical test authorized under AS 28.33.031(a) or AS 28.35.031(a) or (g);

that notice under (a) of this section was provided to the person; and

describing the

circumstances surrounding the arrest and the grounds for the officer’s belief that the person operated a motor vehicle, commercial motor vehicle, or aircraft while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance in violation of AS 28.33.030 or AS

28.35.030

; or

grounds for the officer’s belief that the person operated a motor vehicle or commercial motor vehicle that was involved in an accident causing death or serious physical injury to another person.

The period of revocation of a driver’s license, privilege to drive, privilege to obtain a license, refusal to issue an original license, or disqualification shall be for the appropriate minimum period for court revocations under AS

28.15.181(c)

or court disqualifications under AS

28.33.140

. A department hearing officer may grant limited license privileges in accordance with the standards set out in AS

28.15.201

to a person whose driver’s license or nonresident privilege to drive was revoked under this section. The department may terminate a revocation imposed under this section and issue a driver’s license to the person, if the license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license was revoked for an offense described in AS

28.15.181(a)(5)

or (8) and the person meets the conditions set out for termination of a revocation by the court under AS

28.15.181(f)

.

A person whose driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license has been revoked under this section as a result of a refusal to submit to a chemical test authorized under AS

28.35.031(a)

or (g) or a similar municipal ordinance or a chemical test administered under AS

28.35.031(a)

or (g) or a similar municipal ordinance in which the test produced a result described in AS

28.35.030

(a)(2) may request that the department rescind the revocation. The department shall rescind a revocation under this subsection if the department finds that the person has supplied proof in a form satisfactory to the department that

the person has been acquitted of driving while under the influence under AS

28.35.030

, refusal to submit to a chemical test under AS

28.35.032

, or a similar municipal ordinance for the incident on which the revocation was based; or

all criminal charges against the person for driving while under the influence under AS 28.35.030 or a similar municipal ordinance and refusing to submit to a chemical test under AS

28.35.032

or a similar municipal ordinance in relation to the incident on which the revocation is based have been dismissed.

History.

(§ 3 ch 77 SLA 1983; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 119 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 3 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 55 SLA 1994; am § 10 ch 60 SLA 2002; am § 101 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 23 ch 13 SLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to subsection (e), see sec. 185(l)(2), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendments to subsection (e), see sec. 29, ch. 13, SLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, added (e).

The 2017 amendment, effective June 20, 2017, in (e)(2), at the end, deleted “without prejudice”.

Sec. 28.15.166.
Administrative review of revocation.

A person who has received a notice under AS

28.15.165(a)

may make a written request for administrative review of the department’s action under AS

28.15.165(c)

or for limited license privileges under AS

28.15.165(d)

. If the person’s driver’s license has not been previously surrendered to the department, it shall be surrendered to the department at the time the request for review is made.

A request for review of the department’s action under AS

28.15.165

shall be made within seven days after receipt of the notice under AS

28.15.165

or the right to review is waived and the action of the department under AS

28.15.165(c)

is final. If a written request for a review is made after expiration of the seven-day period, and if it is accompanied by the applicant’s verified statement explaining the failure to make a timely request for a review, the department shall receive and consider the request. If the department finds that the person was unable to make a timely request because of lack of actual notice of the department’s action or because of factors of physical incapacity such as hospitalization or incarceration, the department shall waive the period of limitation, reopen the matter, and grant the review request. An initial request for limited license privileges may be made at any time. Subsequent requests for limited license privileges may not be made unless the applicant demonstrates a significant change in circumstances.

Upon receipt of a request for review, if it appears that the person holds a valid driver’s license and that the driver’s license has been surrendered, the department shall issue a temporary driver’s permit that is valid until the scheduled date for the review. A person who has requested a review under this section may request, and the department may grant for good cause, a delay in the date of the hearing. If necessary, the department may issue additional temporary permits to stay the effective date of its action under AS

28.15.165(c)

until the final order after the review is issued.

A person who has requested a hearing under this section and who fails to attend or appear at the hearing, for reasons other than lack of actual notice of the hearing or physical incapacity such as hospitalization or incarceration, waives the right to a hearing. The determination of the department that is based upon the enforcement officer’s report becomes final.

The hearing under this section must be held by telephone unless the hearing officer finds that a telephonic hearing would substantially prejudice the rights of the person involved in the hearing or that an in-person hearing is necessary to decide the issues to be presented in the hearing. An in-person hearing must be held at the office of the department nearest to the residence of the person involved in the hearing unless the department and the person agree that the hearing is to be held elsewhere.

A review under this section shall be held before a hearing officer designated by the commissioner. The hearing officer has authority to

administer oaths and affirmations;

examine witnesses and take testimony;

receive relevant evidence;

issue subpoenas, take depositions, or cause depositions or interrogatories to be taken;

regulate the course and conduct of the hearing;

make a final ruling on the issue.

The hearing for review of action by the department under AS

28.15.165

shall be limited to the issues of whether the law enforcement officer had probable cause to believe that the person was operating a motor vehicle or commercial motor vehicle that was involved in an accident causing death or serious physical injury to another, or that the person was operating a motor vehicle, commercial motor vehicle, or aircraft while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance in violation of AS

28.33.030

or AS

28.35.030

and whether

the person refused to submit to a chemical test authorized under AS

28.33.031(a)

or AS

28.35.031(a)

or (g) after being advised that refusal would result in disqualification or the suspension, revocation, or denial of the person’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license, and that the refusal is a misdemeanor;

the chemical test administered under AS

28.33.031(a)

or AS

28.35.031(a)

or (g) produced a result described in AS

28.35.030(a)(2)

; or

the chemical test administered under AS 28.33.031(a) produced a result described in AS

28.33.030(a)(2)

.

The determination of the hearing officer may be based upon the sworn report of a law enforcement officer. The law enforcement officer need not be present at the hearing unless either the person requesting the hearing or the hearing officer requests in writing before the hearing that the officer be present. If in the course of the hearing it becomes apparent that the testimony of the law enforcement officer is necessary to enable the hearing officer to resolve disputed issues of fact, the hearing may be continued to allow the attendance of the law enforcement officer.

Testimony given by the person at the hearing is not admissible against the person in a criminal trial unless the person’s testimony at the trial is inconsistent with that given at the hearing.

If the issues set out in (g) of this section are determined in the affirmative by a preponderance of the evidence, the hearing officer shall sustain the action of the department. If one or more of the issues is determined in the negative, the department’s action shall be rescinded.

If the action of the department in revoking a nonresident’s privilege to drive a motor vehicle is not administratively contested by the nonresident driver or if the departmental action is sustained by the hearing officer, the department shall give written notice of action taken to the motor vehicle administrator of the state of the person’s residence and to any state in which that person has a driver’s license.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 119 SLA 1990.]

Within 30 days of the issuance of the final determination of the department, a person aggrieved by the determination may file an appeal in superior court for judicial review of the hearing officer’s determination. The judicial review shall be on the record, without taking additional testimony. The court may reverse the department’s determination if the court finds that the department misinterpreted the law, acted in an arbitrary and capricious manner, or made a determination unsupported by the evidence in the record.

The filing of an appeal under (m) of this section or a petition for review does not automatically stay the department’s order or revocation. The court may grant a stay of the order or revocation only upon a motion and hearing, and upon a finding that there is a reasonable probability that the petitioner will prevail on the merits, that the petitioner will suffer irreparable harm if the order is not stayed, and in a case where the petitioner operates a commercial motor vehicle that the public can be adequately protected by conditions imposed by the court.

History.

(§ 3 ch 77 SLA 1983; am §§ 6 — 10, 34 ch 119 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 158 SLA 1990; am §§ 3 — 6 ch 3 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 55 SLA 1994; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 6 FSSLA 1996; am § 11 ch 60 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For effect of the 1990 amendment of (n) of this section on Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure 603 and 611(d), see § 35, ch. 119, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for the effect of the 1992 amendment of (n) of this section on Alaska Rule of Appellate Procedure 603, see § 31, ch. 3, SLA 1992 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For hearings, see 2 AAC 93, art. 1.

For definitions, see 2 AAC 93, art. 2.

Legislative history reports. —

For Governor’s transmittal letter on HB 445 (from which
ch. 55, SLA 1994, which amended (g) of this section, derived), see 1994 House Journal 2262-2263.

Sec. 28.15.170.
Cancellation. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.171.
Suspending privileges of a person licensed in another jurisdiction; reporting convictions, suspensions, disqualifications, and revocations.

The privilege of driving a motor vehicle on a highway or vehicular way or area of this state given to a person licensed in another jurisdiction is subject to suspension, revocation, disqualification, or limitation by the department or a court in the same manner and for the same reasons as a driver’s license issued under this chapter.

The department shall, upon receiving the record of a conviction of a person licensed in another jurisdiction for a vehicle, driver, or traffic offense in this state, or upon suspending or revoking the person’s driving privilege, forward a copy of the record or suspension or revocation to the motor vehicle administrator for the jurisdiction in which the person convicted is licensed.

If a person licensed to operate a commercial motor vehicle in another jurisdiction is convicted in this state of a traffic offense, whether or not involving a commercial motor vehicle, or if the person is disqualified by this state for a period of 60 days or more, the department shall, within 10 days after notification of the conviction or the disqualification, notify appropriate authorities in the state that issued the license. Within the 10-day period the department shall also notify the United States Department of Transportation if the disqualification is for 60 days or more.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 13 ch 60 SLA 1986; am §§ 7, 8 ch 3 SLA 1992; am § 12 ch 23 SLA 2007)

Sec. 28.15.176.
Administrative revocation of license to drive for consumption or possession of alcohol or drugs.

History.

[Repealed, § 56 ch 16 SLA 2021.]

Sec. 28.15.180.
Suspending privileges of nonresidents. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.181.
Court suspensions, revocations, and limitations.

Conviction of any of the following offenses is grounds for the immediate revocation of a driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license:

manslaughter or negligent homicide resulting from driving a motor vehicle;

a felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used;

failure to stop and give aid as required by law when a motor vehicle accident results in the death or personal injury of another;

perjury or making a false affidavit or statement under oath to the department under a law relating to motor vehicles;

operating a motor vehicle or aircraft while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance;

reckless driving;

using a motor vehicle in unlawful flight to avoid arrest by a peace officer;

refusal to submit to a chemical test authorized under AS

28.33.031(a)

or AS

28.35.031(a)

while under arrest for operating a motor vehicle, commercial motor vehicle, or aircraft while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance, or authorized under AS

28.35.031(g)

;

driving while license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license, canceled, suspended, or revoked, or in violation of a limitation;

vehicle theft in the first degree in violation of AS

11.46.360

or vehicle theft in the second degree in violation of AS

11.46.365

.

A court convicting a person of an offense described in (a)(1) — (4), (6), (7), or (10) of this section shall revoke that person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license for not less than 30 days for the first conviction, unless the court determines that the person’s ability to earn a livelihood would be severely impaired and a limitation under AS

28.15.201

can be placed on the license that will enable the person to earn a livelihood without excessive danger to the public. If a court limits a person’s license under this subsection, it shall do so for not less than 60 days. Upon a subsequent conviction of a person for any offense described in (a)(1) — (4), (6), (7), or (10) of this section occurring within 10 years after a prior conviction, the court shall revoke the person’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license and may not grant the person limited license privileges for the following periods:

not less than one year for the second conviction; and

not less than three years for a third or subsequent conviction.

A court convicting a person of an offense described in (a)(5) or (8) of this section arising out of the operation of a motor vehicle, commercial motor vehicle, or aircraft shall revoke that person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license. The revocation may be concurrent with or consecutive to an administrative revocation under AS

28.15.165

. The court may not, except as provided in AS

28.15.201

, grant limited license privileges during the minimum period of revocation. Except as provided under AS

28.35.030(n)(3)

and

28.35.032(p)(3)

, the minimum periods of revocation are

not less than 90 days if the person has not been previously convicted;

not less than one year if the person has been previously convicted once;

not less than 3 years if the person has been previously convicted twice;

not less than 5 years if the person has been previously convicted more than twice.

A court convicting a person of an offense described in (a)(9) of this section shall revoke that person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license for not less than the minimum period under AS 28.15.291(b)(4).

[Repealed, § 34 ch 119 SLA 1990.]

The court may terminate a revocation for an offense described in (a)(5) or (8) of this section if

the person’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license has been revoked for the minimum periods set out in (c) of this section; and

the person complies with the provisions of AS

28.15.211(d)

and (e).

The court may suspend the driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license of a person who fails to appear in court as required by a citation for an offense involving a moving motor vehicle, or who fails to pay a fine as required by the court for an offense involving a moving motor vehicle. If the court suspends a driver’s license under this subsection, the court shall also provide notice of the suspension to the department. A suspension imposed under this subsection remains in effect until the person appears in court as required by the citation, or pays the fine as required by the court. When the person appears in court or pays the required fine, the court shall terminate the suspension imposed under this subsection and provide the department and the person with written notice of the termination.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 32 SLA 2016.]

In this section, “previously convicted” has the meaning given in AS

28.35.030

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 117 SLA 1982; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 77 SLA 1983; am §§ 11 — 15, 34 ch 119 SLA 1990; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 3 SLA 1992; am §§ 2, 3 ch 59 SLA 1993; am § 4 ch 55 SLA 1994; am § 5 ch 47 SLA 1996; am §§ 7, 8 ch 71 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 65 SLA 2001; am §§ 12, 13 ch 60 SLA 2002; am § 22 ch 32 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (f) was enacted as (g); relettered in 1993, at which time former (f) was relettered as (g) (now (i)). Subsection (g) was enacted as (h). Relettered in 1996, at which time former (g) was relettered as (h) (now (i)). Subsection (h) was enacted as (i); relettered in 2001, at which time former (h) was relettered as (i).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, repealed (h).

Editor's notes. —

Subsection (d) refers to "the minimum period under AS 28.15.291(b)(4)" with regard to license revocations. AS 28.25.291(b) was repealed and reenacted in 2016 and there is no longer "a minimum period under" that subsection nor is there a paragraph (b)(4). The effect of this is uncertain.

Sec. 28.15.182.
Court revocation of license for accident causing death.

A court convicting a person for a violation of the traffic laws may revoke the driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license of a person if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that

the person was operating a motor vehicle or commercial motor vehicle that was involved in an accident;

the accident caused the death of another person; and

the violation of traffic laws by the person was a significant contributing cause of the accident.

The license revocation imposed under (a) of this section may be for a period of up to three years. This period is concurrent with any other period of revocation under AS

28.15.165

or

28.15.181

, or any other action imposed by the department or court in connection with the accident.

A court revoking a person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license under (a) of this section may consider a request for a limited license by the person. A court may not grant a limited license if another statute prohibits a limited license for violation of its provisions. A court shall require a certification of employment to prove any claim based on the person’s employment and a certification of need by a licensed health care practitioner to prove a claim based on care for another person. After a review has been made of the person’s driving record and other relevant information, the court may grant limited license privileges for all or part of the period of revocation if the court finds that a limitation can be placed on the license that will enable the person to drive without danger to the public and that, without a limited license,

the person’s ability to earn a livelihood would be severely impaired; or

the person would be severely impaired in acting as the primary caregiver for someone with a debilitating physical or mental condition.

When imposing a limitation under (c) of this section, the court shall

require the surrender of the driver’s license; and

issue to the person a certificate valid for the duration of the limitation specifying the terms of the limited license.

A representative of the family of a person who died under circumstances as described in (a) of this section may testify at a hearing addressing a driver’s license revocation under (a) of this section or a request for a limited license under (c) of this section.

In this section, “traffic laws” has the meaning given in AS

28.15.261

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 89 SLA 2003)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4, ch. 89, SLA 2003 provides that this section applies “to actions taken regarding a motor vehicle or commercial vehicle accident that caused the death of a person and that occurred on or after September 1, 2003.”

Sec. 28.15.183.
Administrative revocation of license to drive.

If a peace officer has probable cause to believe that a person who is at least 14 years of age but not yet 21 years of age has operated a vehicle after consuming alcohol in violation of AS

28.35.280

, or refused to submit to a chemical test under AS

28.35.285

, and the peace officer has cited the person or arrested the person for the offense, the peace officer shall read a notice and deliver a copy to the person. The notice must advise that

the department intends to revoke the person’s driver’s license or permit, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license or permit;

the person has the right to administrative review of the revocation;

if the person has a driver’s license or permit, the notice itself is a temporary driver’s license or permit that expires 10 days after it is delivered to the person;

revocation of the person’s driver’s license or permit, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license or permit, takes effect 10 days after delivery of the notice to the person unless the person, within 10 days, requests an administrative review;

if the person has been cited under AS

28.35.280

or under AS

28.35.285

, that person, under AS

28.35.290

, may not operate a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft during the 24 hours following issuance of the citation.

After reading the notice under (a) of this section, the peace officer shall seize the person’s driver’s license or permit if it is in the person’s possession and shall deliver it to the department with a sworn report describing the circumstances under which it was seized.

Unless the person has requested an administrative review, the department shall revoke the person’s driver’s license or permit, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license or permit, effective 10 days after delivery to the person of the notice required under (a) of this section, upon receipt of a sworn report of a peace officer

that the officer had probable cause to believe that the person is at least 14 years of age but not yet 21 years of age and has violated one of the offenses described in (a) of this section;

that the peace officer has cited or arrested the person for a violation of AS

28.35.280

or

28.35.285

or a municipal ordinance with substantially similar elements;

that notice under (a) of this section was provided to the person; and

describing the circumstances surrounding the offense.

The department shall impose the revocation required under this section

for a first revocation, for a period of 30 days;

for a second revocation, for a period of 60 days;

for a third revocation, for a period of 90 days; or

for a fourth or subsequent revocation, for a period of one year.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

28.20.240

and

28.20.250

, the department may not require proof of financial responsibility before restoring a driver’s license, permit, or privilege that is revoked under this section.

A revocation imposed under this section shall be consecutive to a revocation imposed under another provision of law, except that (1) a revocation imposed under this section shall be concurrent with a prior revocation imposed under this section; and (2) a revocation imposed under this section for an offense for which a revocation is required under AS

28.15.185

shall be concurrent with a revocation imposed under AS

28.15.185

that is based on the same incident. A person whose driver’s license, permit, or privilege was revoked for a period of at least 60 days under this section may apply for limited license privileges under AS

28.15.201(d)

. A person whose driver’s license, permit, or privilege to drive was revoked for a period of more than one year under this section may apply for reinstatement as provided under (i) of this section.

Except as provided under (h) of this section, the department may not issue a new license or reissue a license to a person whose driver’s license, permit, or privilege to drive has been revoked under this section unless the person, if required to participate in a juvenile alcohol safety action program, as defined in AS

04.21.080

, has successfully completed any education or treatment recommended.

The department may waive the provisions of (g) of this section if a person who is required to obtain drug or alcoholism treatment resides in an area where drug rehabilitation or alcoholism treatment is unavailable.

A person whose driver’s license, permit, or privilege to drive was revoked under this section may apply for reinstatement of the person’s driver’s license as provided in this subsection. A person may apply to the department for reinstatement by filing a written request for review of the revocation imposed under this section with the department. The department shall issue a new license or reissue the person’s driver’s license as provided under AS

28.15.211(d)

if the department finds that

the application for reinstatement is filed at least one year after the person’s license, permit, or privilege was revoked;

the person complies with (g) of this section; and

the person has not violated a provision of this title or a regulation of the department since the revocation.

In this section, “peace officer” does not include a person employed by the Department of Corrections.

History.

(§ 1 ch 71 SLA 1994; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 9 SLA 1995; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 143 SLA 1996; am §§ 4, 5 ch 93 SLA 1998; am §§ 1 — 5 ch 88 SLA 1999; am §§ 7 — 10 ch 65 SLA 2001; am § 6 ch 86 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (i) was enacted as (j).
Relettered in 1999, at which time (i) was relettered as (j), and an internal reference in subsection (f) was conformed.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, in (g), substituted “as defined in AS

04.21.080

” for “as defined in AS

04.16.050

”.

Sec. 28.15.184.
Administrative review of revocation of a minor’s license.

A person who has received a notice under AS

28.15.183(a)

may make a written request for administrative review of the department’s action. If the person’s driver’s license or permit has not been previously surrendered to the department, it shall be surrendered to the department at the time the request for review is made.

A request for review of the department’s revocation under AS

28.15.183

shall be made within 10 days after receipt of the notice under AS

28.15.183

or the right to review is waived and the action of the department under AS

28.15.183(c)

is final. If a written request for a review is made after expiration of the 10-day period, and if it is accompanied by the applicant’s verified statement explaining the failure to make a timely request for a review, the department shall receive and consider the request. If the department finds that the person was unable to make a timely request because of lack of actual notice of the revocation or because of factors of physical incapacity such as hospitalization or incarceration, the department shall waive the period of limitation, reopen the matter, and grant the review request.

Upon receipt of a request for review, if it appears that the person holds a valid driver’s license or permit and that the driver’s license or permit has been surrendered, the department shall issue a temporary driver’s permit that is valid until the scheduled date for the review. A person who has requested a review under this section may request, and the department may grant for good cause, a delay in the date of the hearing. If necessary, the department may issue additional temporary permits to stay the effective date of its action under AS

28.15.183(c)

until the final order after the review is issued.

A person who has requested a hearing under this section and who fails to appear at the hearing, for reasons other than lack of actual notice of the hearing or physical incapacity such as hospitalization or incarceration, waives the right to a hearing. The determination of the department that is based upon the officer’s report becomes final.

Notwithstanding AS

28.05.141(b)

, the hearing under this section may be held telephonically at the discretion of the hearing officer.

A review under this section shall be held before a hearing officer designated by the commissioner. The hearing officer may

administer oaths and affirmations;

examine witnesses and take testimony;

receive relevant evidence;

issue subpoenas, take depositions, or cause depositions or interrogatories to be taken;

regulate the course and conduct of the hearing;

make a final ruling on the issue.

The hearing for review of a revocation by the department under AS

28.15.183

shall be limited to the issues of whether the person was at least 14 years of age but not yet 21 years of age and whether the person operated a vehicle after consuming alcohol in violation of AS

28.35.280

or refused to submit to a chemical test of breath in violation of AS

28.35.285

.

The determination of the hearing officer may be based upon the sworn report of a peace officer, if the sworn report is supported by probable cause based on personal observations as required under AS

28.15.183(a)

. The peace officer need not be present at the hearing unless either the person requesting the hearing or the hearing officer requests in writing before the hearing that the officer be present. If in the course of the hearing it becomes apparent that the testimony of the peace officer is necessary to enable the hearing officer to resolve disputed issues of fact, the hearing shall be continued to allow the attendance of the peace officer.

Testimony given at the hearing is not admissible in a criminal trial unless the testimony given at the trial is inconsistent with testimony given at the hearing.

If the issues set out in (g) of this section are determined in the affirmative by a preponderance of the evidence, the hearing officer shall sustain the action of the department. If one or more of the issues is determined in the negative, the department’s revocation action shall be rescinded.

If the action of the department in revoking a nonresident’s privilege to drive a motor vehicle is not administratively contested by the nonresident driver or if the departmental action is sustained by the hearing officer, the department shall give written notice of action taken to the motor vehicle administrator of the state of the person’s residence and to any state in which that person has a driver’s license.

Within 30 days of the issuance of the final determination of the department, a person aggrieved by the determination may file an appeal in superior court for judicial review of the hearing officer’s determination. The judicial review shall be on the record without taking additional testimony. The court may reverse the department’s determination if the court finds that the department misinterpreted the law, acted in an arbitrary and capricious manner, or made a determination unsupported by the evidence in the record.

The filing of an appeal under (l) of this section or a petition for review does not automatically stay the department’s order or revocation. The court may grant a stay of the order or revocation under the applicable rules of court, after a motion and hearing, and upon a finding that there is a reasonable probability that the petitioner will prevail on the merits and that the petitioner will suffer irreparable harm if the order is not stayed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 71 SLA 1994; am § 4 ch 9 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 143 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 88 SLA 1999; am § 11 ch 65 SLA 2001)